Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.155

Community and economic development fee account.

The community and economic development fee account is created in the state treasury. The department may create subaccounts as necessary. The account consists of all receipts from fees charged by the department under RCW 43.330.150, 43.330.152, and * 43.210.110. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 1994 c 284 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.210.110 was repealed by 1991 c 314 s 18, effective June 30, 1997.

Effective date—1994 c 284: See RCW 43.22A.901.